Maryland, session 2026, HB0092.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the new part designation “Part I. Labeling of Biodegradable and Compostable Plastic
Products” be added to immediately precede Section 9–2101 of Article – Environment of the
Annotated Code of Maryland.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0092*

HOUSE BILL 92
Article – Environment
9–2101.
(a) In this [subtitle] PART the following words have the meanings indicated.
9–2105.
(a) A person that violates this [subtitle] PART is subject to:
(1) For a first violation, a civil penalty of $500;
(2) For a second violation, a civil penalty of $1,000; and
(3) For a third and subsequent violation, a civil penalty of $2,000.
(b) Any penalties collected under this section shall be paid to the county,
municipality, or other local government that brought the enforcement action.
9–2106. RESERVED.
9–2107. RESERVED.
PART II. PLASTIC RING CONNECTORS.
9–2108.
IN THIS PART, “BIODEGRADABLE MATERIAL” MEANS A MATERIAL THAT IS
ABLE TO BE BROKEN DOWN INTO NATURAL, HARMLESS SUBSTANCES BY LIVING
MICROORGANISMS.
9–2109.
(A) A PERSON MAY NOT SELL, OFFER FOR SALE, OR DISTRIBUTE FOR SALE,
BEVERAGE CONTAINERS THAT ARE CONNECTED TO OTHER BEVERAGE CONTAINERS
WITH A PLASTIC RING CONNECTOR UNLESS THE PLASTIC RING CONNECTOR IS MADE
OF BIODEGRADABLE MATERIAL.
(B) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO ADMINISTER AND
ENFORCE THIS SECTION.
9–2110.
(A) THE PROVISIONS OF §§ 9–334 THROUGH 9–344 OF THIS TITLE APPLY TO
ENFORCE VIOLATIONS OF:

HOUSE BILL 92 3
(1) THIS PART;
(2) ANY REGULATION ADOPTED UNDER THIS PART; OR
(3) ANY ORDER ISSUED UNDER THIS PART.
(B) ANY PENALTY COLLECTED BY THE DEPARTMENT UNDER THIS SECTION
SHALL BE PAID INTO THE MARYLAND CLEAN WATER FUND ESTABLISHED UNDER §
9–320 OF THIS TITLE.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.